Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 31 Unit Pricing

6-31-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Consumer commodity” means any food, drug, device, or cosmetic and other article, product, or commodity of any other kind or class, except for drugs sold only by prescription, that:

Are customarily produced for sale to retail sales agencies or instrumentalities for consumption by individuals; for use by individuals for purposes of personal care; or in the performance of services ordinarily rendered in or around the household; and

Usually are consumed or expended in the course of the consumption or use.

“Director” means the director of business regulation.

“Retail price” means the price at which the consumer commodity is sold to the ultimate customer.

“Sale at Retail” means sale of a consumer commodity to the ultimate customer.

“Total price” of a consumer commodity means the full purchase price of a consumer commodity without regard to units of weight, measure, or count.

“Ultimate customer” is a person who purchases a product other than for resale.

“Unit price” of a consumer commodity means the retail price of a consumer commodity expressed in terms of the retail price of the commodity per the unit of weight, measure, or count, as the director designates, computed to the nearest whole cent or fraction thereof as the director designates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 23.

6-31-2.
Consumer information required.

Every person who sells, offers for sale, or exposes for sale at retail any aluminum foil, bread, carbonated soft drinks, cereals, cooking oils, dog or cat food, facial tissues, fish, fowl, fruits, grains, meats, napkins, plastic food wrapping, vegetables, waxed paper, or other consumer commodity designated by the director, shall disclose to the consumer the unit price of the consumer commodity as provided in this chapter.

The same unit of weight, measure, or count shall be utilized to express the unit price of different sizes or brand names of the same or similar consumer commodities. All stamps, tags, or labels expressing the total price shall be standardized within each place of business and shall set forth the cents from dollars by use of a decimal point, different type or type size, or a cents sign.

Every person who sells, offers for sale, or exposes for sale at retail any consumer commodity shall disclose to the consumer the total price of the consumer commodity as provided in this chapter.

Wherever meat, poultry, fish, fresh vegetables, and fresh fruit are sold by a measure of weight and are packaged or wrapped for sale by a retailer in advance of being sold, offered for sale, or exposed for sale, an accurate computing scale of adequate capacity shall be placed in a conspicuous accessible location so the buyer may weigh the product that is being purchased.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 23.

6-31-3.
Means of disclosure.

Persons subject to the requirements of §

6-31-2

shall disclose the unit price and total price to consumers in one or more of the following appropriate ways:

If the consumer commodity is so located that it is not conspicuously visible to the consumer, or if the consumer commodity is so located that the price information, if displayed in accordance with subdivision (2), would not be conspicuously visible to the consumer by a sign or list bearing the price information conspicuously placed near the point of procurement; or

By attachment of a stamp, tag, or label directly adjacent to the consumer commodity, on the shelf on which the commodity is displayed, or by stamping or affixing the price information on the commodity itself; provided, however, that upon each commodity shall be stamped or affixed the total price of the commodity in arabic numerals if and when a computerized system is used; or

In accord with regulations promulgated by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 23.

6-31-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 15, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 392, § 1, effective July 12, 1990.

6-31-5.
Director’s powers.

The director shall do all of the following:

Designate by regulation those consumer commodities, in addition to the consumer commodities specifically enumerated in §

6-31-2(a)

, as to which display of the unit price shall be required upon a determination that the display will be in the best interest of consumers;

Designate by regulation the unit of weight, measure, or count in terms of which the unit price of each consumer commodity shall be expressed, provided that no designated unit shall be such as to require persons subject to the provisions of §

6-31-2(a)

to measure any consumer commodity solely for the purpose of complying with § 6-31-2(a);

Designate by regulation whether the unit price of each consumer commodity subject to the provisions of § 6-31-2(a) shall be expressed to the nearest whole cent or to an appropriate fraction thereof;

Exempt, by regulation, classes of retail establishments from any or all requirements of this chapter upon a determination that because sales of consumer commodities regulated by this chapter are purely incidental to the business of the classes of retail establishments, compliance with this chapter is impracticable and unnecessary for adequate protection of consumers; provided, however, that any person, firm, corporation, or other business entity with less than eight (8) full-time employees shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter;

Prescribe, by regulation, means for the disclosure of price information upon determination that they are more effective than those prescribed in §

6-31-3

; and

Promulgate any other regulation necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter in accordance with the best interests of consumers.

The director shall give public notice of his or her intention to promulgate regulations pursuant to subsection (a) and shall receive the opinions of interested parties on the regulations. Regulations shall take effect thirty (30) days from the date on which the notice is given.

The director shall hold hearings whenever he or she has probable cause to believe, or whenever twenty-five (25) or more citizens state in writing to the director their belief, that the actions of any person subject to the provisions of this chapter have evidenced a pattern of noncompliance with any or all of those provisions. Pursuant to the hearings, to which the suspected violator shall be invited with written notice at least ten (10) days before the hearing is held, the director shall, upon a finding that a pattern of noncompliance has been shown:

Issue a warning citation; or

Report any pattern of noncompliance to the attorney general who shall cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted in the proper courts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 529, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 23.

6-31-6.
Penalties.

Any person whose actions evince a pattern of noncompliance with any or all provisions of this chapter shall be punishable by imprisonment for a term not exceeding six (6) months or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by a fine only of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 15, § 1.